Utah statutes.
62A-14-105.   Powers and duties of the office.

(1)  The office shall:

(a)  before January 1, 2000, develop and operate a statewide program to:

(i)  educate the public about the role and function of guardians and conservators; and

(ii)  serve as a guardian, conservator, or both for a ward upon appointment by a court when no other person is able and willing to do so and the office petitioned for or agreed in advance to the appointment;

(b)  possess and exercise all the powers and duties specifically given to the office by virtue of being appointed as guardian or conservator of a ward, including the power to access a ward's records;

(c)  review and monitor the personal and, if appropriate, financial status of each ward for whom the office has been appointed to serve as guardian or conservator;

(d)  train and monitor each employee and volunteer, and monitor each contract provider to whom the office has delegated a responsibility for a ward;

(e)  retain all court-delegated powers and duties for a ward;

(f)  report on the personal and financial status of a ward as required by a court in accordance with Title 75, Chapter 5, Protection of Persons Under Disability and Their Property;

(g)  handle a ward's funds in accordance with the department's trust account system;

(h)  request that the department's audit plan, established pursuant to Section 63I-5-401, include the requirement of an annual audit of all funds and property held by the office on behalf of wards;

(i)  maintain accurate records concerning each ward, the ward's property, and office services provided to the ward;

(j)  make reasonable and continuous efforts to find a family member, friend, or other person to serve as a ward's guardian or conservator;

(k)  after termination as guardian or conservator, distribute a ward's property in accordance with Title 75, Chapter 5, Protection of Persons Under Disability and Their Property;

(l)  submit recommendations for changes in state law and funding to the governor and the Legislature and report to the governor and Legislature, upon request; and

(m)  establish, implement, and enforce rules.

(2)  The office may:

(a)  petition a court pursuant to Title 75, Chapter 5, Protection of Persons Under Disability and Their Property, to be appointed an incapacitated person's guardian, conservator, or both after conducting a prepetition assessment under Section 62A-14-107;

(b)  develop and operate a statewide program to recruit, train, supervise, and monitor volunteers to assist the office in providing guardian and conservator services;

(c)  delegate one or more responsibilities for a ward to an employee, volunteer, or contract provider, except as provided in Subsection 62A-14-107(1);

(d)  solicit and receive private donations to provide guardian and conservator services under this chapter; and

(e)  adopt rules, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to:

(i)  effectuate policy; and

(ii)  carry out the office's role as guardian and conservator of wards as provided in this chapter.

